Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2179.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 42-5-1 and 42-5-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-5 entitled
"Standard and Daylight Saving Time" are hereby repealed.
42-5-1. Period of daylight saving time.
At two o’clock antemeridian (2:00 a.m.) of the second Sunday in March of each year, the
standard time in this state shall be advanced one hour, and at two o’clock antemeridian (2:00 a.m.)
of the first Sunday in November of each year the standard time in this state shall, by the retarding
of one hour, be made to coincide with the mean astronomical time of the degree of longitude
governing the zone wherein the state is situated, the standard official time of which is described as
United States standard eastern time so that between the second Sunday in March at two o’clock
antemeridian (2:00 a.m.) and the first Sunday in November at two o’clock antemeridian (2:00 a.m.)
in each year the standard time of the state shall be one hour in advance of the United States standard
eastern time.
42-5-2. Effect of time change.
In all laws, statutes, orders, decrees, rules, and regulations relating to the time of
performance of any act by any officer or department of the state, or of any county, city, town, or
district thereof, or relating to the time in which any rights shall accrue or determine, or within which
any act shall or shall not be performed by any person subject to the jurisdiction of the state, and in
all public schools and in all institutions of the state, or of any county, city, town, or district thereof,

and in all contracts or choses in action made or to be performed in the state, it shall be understood
and intended that the time shall be United States standard eastern time as changed by § 42-5-1.
SECTION 2. Title 42 of the General Laws entitled "STATE AFFAIRS AND
GOVERNMENT" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 5.2
STANDARD SAVING TIME
42-5.2-1. Period and effect of standard saving time.
Standard time within the state shall be permanent standard time, as defined by “United
States Standard Eastern Time” and shall be exempt from the advancement of time as provided by
the federal Uniform Time Act of 1966, 15 U.S.C. § 260(a). Standard time shall apply to all laws,
statutes, orders, decrees, rules and regulations relating to the time of performance of any act by any
officer or department of the state, or of any county, city, town or district thereof, or any other
political subdivision. Standard time shall also apply to all laws, statutes, orders, decrees, rules and
regulations relating to the time in which any rights shall accrue or determine, or within which any
act shall or shall not be performed by any person subject to the jurisdiction of the state in all public
schools and in all institutions of the state, or of any county, city, town or district thereof, or any
other political subdivision thereof and in all contracts in action made or to be performed in the state.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage and enactment by law of a permanent
year-round “United States Eastern Standard Time” in the states of Connecticut, Massachusetts,
New Hampshire, Rhode Island and Vermont, in substantially the same form as § 42-5.2-1 and upon
a date agreed upon by all five (5) states.
========
LC003948
========
LC003948 - Page 2 of 3